src/morphology/stems/propernouns_newwords.lexc
LEXICON PROP_NEWWORDS
  PROP_NEWWORDS_ANTH ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_INE ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_ADE ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_TYHI ;

LEXICON PROP_NEWWORDS_ANTH
Anne+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Anne PROP_1HANS1A ;
Mehka+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Mehka PROP_1HANS1A ;
Hellä+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Hellä PROP_1HERRAE ;
Mari+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Mari PROP_1HANS1A ;

Piitre+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Piitre PROP_2KERGE ;
Mihkli+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Mihkli PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Katri+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Katri PROP_2ARTIKLI ;

Kallõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Ka%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV "" ;
Sullõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Su%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV "" ;
Ollõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:O%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV "" ;

Pauĺ+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Pau%{lĺ%} PROP_38PULL1 ;
Hipṕ+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Hipp PROP_38PAPP1 ;

Tsirgurada+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Tsirgura%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a PROP_44SWDA "_#a, #ta __Tsirgura|da_" ;
